Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-1438
Law enforcement reserve force; members; appointment; prohibited acts; functions allowed.

(1) The governing body of any county or city of this state, other than (a) a county containing a city of the metropolitan or primary class or (b) a city of the metropolitan or primary class, may establish a law enforcement reserve force. Members of such force shall be appointed at the discretion of the governing body. The governing body may limit the size of such reserve force.

(2)(a) A member of a law enforcement reserve force appointed under this section cannot make arrests, issue citations, detain members of the public, or seize evidence without being under the direct supervision of a physically present certified law enforcement officer.

(b) A reserve officer may perform functions at the direction of the county sheriff or chief of police when under the direct supervision of the county sheriff or chief of police. Such functions shall not include making arrests, issuing citations, detaining members of the public, or seizing evidence.

(c) A reserve officer is not limited with respect to the amount of hours worked annually.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 1162, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB51, § 19.